Maryland, session 2026, HB0522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–1311.
(a) [The] FOR AN EVENT WITH AN ESTIMATED ATTENDANCE OF FEWER
THAN 500 INDIVIDUALS:
(1) THE fee for a Class C per diem beer license and a Class C per diem beer
and wine license is $25 per day[.]; AND
[(b)] (2) [The] THE fee for a Class C per diem beer, wine, and liquor license is
$50 per day.
– 1 –

Ch. 858 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) FOR AN EVENT WITH AN ESTIMATED ATTENDANCE OF 500 OR MORE
INDIVIDUALS:
(1) THE FEE FOR A CLASS C PER DIEM BEER LICENSE AND A CLASS C
PER DIEM BEER AND WINE LICENSE IS $25 PER POINT OF SALE LOCATION THAT
SERVES ALCOHOL AT THE EVENT PER DAY; AND
(2) THE FEE FOR A CLASS C PER DIEM BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
LICENSE IS $50 PER POINT OF SALE LOCATION THAT SERVES ALCOHOL AT THE
EVENT PER DAY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –